lexd_components/hyx-verbs_obs.lexd
##Obsolete verbs
LEXICON VerbRootUv(2)		#Obsolete/Archaic, Class 7 արտահեղուլ
արտահեղուլ:արտահեղ <iv>


LEXICON VerbRootUc(2)		#Obsolete/Archaic, Class 8 թողուլ
զեղուլ:զեղ <tv>
զեղուլ:զեղ <iv>
թողուլ:թող <tv>
լեսուլ:լես <tv>
հեղուլ:հեղ <tv>
յեղուլ:յեղ <tv>
յեռուլ:յեռ <tv>

LEXICON VerbRootUcanel(2)		#Obsolete/Archaic, Class 11 ուսուցանել and 12 ծանուցանել
 		#All of its entries are preferably part of class 1 & 2
ապացուցանել:ապացուց <tv>
ուսուցանել:ուսուց <tv>
ծանուցանել:ծանուց <tv>
կառուցանել:կառուց <tv>
կացուցանել:կացուց <tv>
հատուցանել:հատուց <tv>
մատուցանել:մատուց <tv>
յարուցանել:յարուց <tv>
սնուցանել:սնուց <tv>

LEXICON VerbRootNulV(2)		#Obsolete/Archaic Class Class 21 երդնուլ
երդնուլ:երդ <iv>
երդնուլ:երդ <tv>
ընթեռնուլ:ընթեռ <iv>
ընթեռնուլ:ընթեռ <tv>

LEXICON VerbRootNulC(2)		#Obsolete/Archaic Class Class 22 զբօսնուլ
զարթնուլ:զարթ <iv>
զբօսնուլ:զբօս <iv>
զգածնուլ:զգած <iv>
զգեծնուլ:զգեծ <iv?>
զգենուլ:զգե <iv>
զգենուլ:զգե <tv>
զենուլ:զե <tv>
հեղձնուլ:հեղձ <iv>
յենուլ:յե <iv>
ոստնուլ:ոստ <iv>
պակնուլ:պակ <iv>
պշնուլ:պշ <tv>
պշնուլ:պշ <iv>
ջեռնուլ:ջեռ <iv>
